Hawaii statutes.
§667-59
Actions and communications with the mortgagor in connection with a foreclosure.
A foreclosing mortgagee shall be bound by all agreements, obligations,
representations, or inducements made on its behalf by its agents, including but
not limited to its employees, representatives, mortgage servicers, or persons
authorized by a foreclosing mortgagee or lender pursuant to an affiliate
statement recorded in the bureau of conveyances pursuant to
section 667-58. [L 2011, c 48, pt of §6; am L 2012, c 182, §33]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next